Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-111
Historical monuments; defacing prohibited; penalty.

Any person who shall destroy, deface, remove or injure any of the monuments erected by the state to mark the Oregon Trail in Nebraska shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1911, c. 134, § 4, p. 447;

R.S.1913, § 7177;

C.S.1922, § 6828;

C.S.1929, § 82-112;

R.S.1943, § 82-111;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 306.